Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1505
Supplier; competition and antitrust provisions; exemption.

In the exercise of the powers granted in sections 70-1501 to 70-1505 and in Chapter 70, article 10, to execute agreements authorized by sections 70-1501 to 70-1505 or other agreements authorized by Chapter 70, article 10, a supplier of electric power and energy shall be exempt from any law, rule, or regulation of this state regulating competition. It is intended that a supplier of electric power and energy carrying out the activities described by an agreement authorized by sections 70-1501 to 70-1505 or any other agreement authorized by Chapter 70, article 10, receive full exemption and immunity from state and federal antitrust laws in light of the public purposes and regulatory provisions of sections 70-1501 to 70-1505.

Laws 1984, LB 805, § 5.